Utah statutes.
36-14-3.   Contents.
Each legislative subpoena shall include:
(1)  the name of the legislative body or office on whose behalf the subpoena
is issued;
(2)  the signature of the issuer;
(3)  a command to the person or entity to whom the subpoena is addressed to:
(a)  appear and testify at the time and place set forth in the subpoena;
(b)  appear and testify before some legislative body or office and produce
accounts, books, papers, documents, or other tangible things designated in the
subpoena; or
(c)  produce accounts, books, papers, documents, or other tangible things
designated in the subpoena at the time and place designated in the subpoena.
